Hawaii statutes.
§286-130 No operation under foreign license
during revocation or suspension in this State. Any resident or nonresident
whose driver's license or right or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this
State has been suspended or revoked shall not operate a motor vehicle in this
State under a license, permit, or registration certificate issued by any other
jurisdiction or otherwise during the suspension or after the revocation until a
new license issued by the examiner of drivers is obtained when and as permitted
by law. [L 1937, c 234, §27; RL 1945, §7328; RL 1955, §160-60; HRS §286-130; am
L 1970, c 164, §3; am L 1982, c 251, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next